Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 9. Benefits.

§ 51.1-152.
Limitations on average final compensation.

If an employee receives increases in compensation in the last four years of service which are not related to promotion and which exceed the average increase received by other employees of the same employer holding comparable positions, the excess shall be excluded when computing the average final compensation if the Board finds, after consideration of all circumstances, that the primary purpose of the salary increase was to increase the retirement benefit of the employee.
If there are no employees of the same employer holding comparable positions, the increases may be excluded from the average final compensation if they exceed the average percentage increase received by all other employees of the same employer.
Creditable compensation assumed to have been received for the purpose of purchasing service shall be excluded from a member’s average final compensation.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.10; 1954, c. 497; 1956, c. 98; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 64; 1960, c. 604; 1966, cc. 174, 175; 1970, c. 779; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 88, 185; 1972, cc. 568, 708; 1973, cc. 322, 523, 545, 546; 1974, cc. 353, 484; 1975, cc. 597, 611; 1976, cc. 678, 699; 1977, c. 620; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.10:01; 1982, cc. 467, 478; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1987, c. 392; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-153.
Service retirement.

Normal retirement. — Any member in service at his normal retirement date with five or more years of creditable service may retire at any time upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective. Any member in service who was denied membership prior to July 1, 1987, as a result of being age 60 or over when first employed may retire at any time after his normal retirement date and the requirement of having five or more years of service shall not apply.

Early retirement. — 1. Any member in service who has attained his fifty-fifth birthday with five or more years of creditable service may retire prior to his normal retirement date upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective.However, a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, under this chapter shall be allowed to retire under this subdivision prior to his normal retirement date only if the person is in service and has attained his sixtieth birthday with five or more years of creditable service, and the benefit for such person shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 3 of §

51.1-155

.

Deferred retirement for members terminating service. — Any member who terminates service after five or more years of creditable service, regardless of termination date, may retire under the provisions of subsection A, B, or D if he has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions prior to the effective date of his retirement or if he has five or more years of creditable service for which his employer has paid the contributions and such contributions cannot be withdrawn. For the purposes of this subsection, any requirements as to the member being in service shall not apply.

50/10 retirement. — Any member in service on or after January 1, 1994, who has attained his fiftieth birthday with 10 or more years of creditable service may retire prior to his normal retirement date upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective. A person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, shall not be allowed to retire pursuant to this subsection.

Effective date of retirement. — The effective date of retirement shall be after the last day of service of the member, but shall not be more than 90 days prior to the filing of the notice of retirement.

Notification on behalf of member. — If the member is physically or mentally unable to submit written notification of his intention to retire, the member’s appointing authority may submit notification on his behalf.

2.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision 3, any state employee, teacher, or employee of a political subdivision who is a member of the retirement system may retire prior to his normal retirement date after attaining age 50 and 30 years of creditable service, upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective. The benefit for such member shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

.

3.

A person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, as a state employee, teacher, or employee of a political subdivision may retire prior to his normal retirement date after the sum of his age and years of creditable service equals 90, upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective. The benefit for such member shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

.

4.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a political subdivision by legally adopted resolution may declare to the Board that, for purposes of subdivisions B 1 and B 3 and subsection D, and subdivision A 3 of §

51.1-155

, any person who is an individual who meets the definition of “emergency medical services personnel” in §

32.1-111.1

or who is employed as a firefighter, or law-enforcement officer as those terms are defined in § 15.2-1512.2 (i) shall not be considered a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) shall be deemed to have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013. Such resolution shall be irrevocable.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.53; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1976, c. 429; 1977, c. 620; 1982, c. 427; 1986, c. 474; 1988, c. 222; 1990, c. 832; 1995, cc. 152, 692, 811; 1996, cc. 768, 997; 1999, cc. 111, 567, 568, 569, 591, 592, 598, 599; 2000, cc. 66, 657, 911; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2011, c. 483; 2012, cc. 701, 811, 823; 2013, cc. 456, 666; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 768, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who retired pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of §

51.1-153

on or after March 10, 1995.”

Acts 1999, cc. 567, 568, 569, 591, 592, 598 and 599, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to employees of political subdivisions participating in the retirement system as provided for in §

51.1-130

unless the employer notifies the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System otherwise in writing on or before July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 111 inserted “regardless of termination date” in subsection C.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 567, 568, 569, 591, 592, 598 and 599 are identical, and in subsection B, added the subdivision 1 designator, and added subdivision 2.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the former second sentence of subsection D.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911 deleted the former last two sentences of subsection D, which read: “A member who is a state employee shall not be eligible for retirement pursuant to this subsection unless the employee has entered into a binding agreement with the Department of Personnel and Training providing that the employee shall not thereafter reenter into full-time or part-time employment with any agency in the executive branch of the Commonwealth for a period of two years following retirement. Institutions of higher education may enter into a contract with a member on a part-time basis, not to exceed twenty hours per week, to provide unique technical expertise for projects sponsored by institution-affiliated research foundations, authorities, or nonprofit corporations.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and inserted the second paragraph of subdivision B 1; inserted “Subject to the provisions of subdivision 3” at the beginning of subdivision B 2; inserted subdivision B 3; and inserted the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 483 deleted the former last two sentences in subsection C, which read: “No member shall be entitled to the benefits of this subsection if his employer certifies that his service was terminated because of dishonesty, malfeasance, or malfeasance in office. The certification may be appealed to the Board.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and inserted “or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013,” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subdivision B 1, in the first sentence of subdivision B 3 and in the second sentence of subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section. Acts 2012, c. 823, further amended subsections K 1 and N. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2012 amendment by c. 811 inserted subdivision B 4 and made stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 456 and 666, are nearly identical, and in subdivision B 4, substituted “subdivisions B 1 and B 3 and subsection D” for “subdivisions 1 and 3,” inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted clause (ii). Subdivision B 4 is set out in the form above as directed by the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “an individual who meets the definition of ‘emergency medical services personnel’ in §

32.1-111.1

or who is employed as a firefighter” for “employed as a firefighter, emergency medical technician” in subdivision B 4 and deleted “of this section” following “D” in subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Pensions, § 2.

§ 51.1-154.
Compulsory service retirement.

Any employer, subsequent to the employee’s normal retirement date, may provide for compulsory service retirement upon a determination that age is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the particular business or that an employee is incapable of performing his duties in a safe and efficient manner.
Any such determination shall be made by the employer.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.54; 1954, c. 460; 1956, c. 458; 1958, c. 356; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 59; 1966, c. 147; 1968, c. 177; 1970, c. 476; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 185; 1972, c. 26; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 611; 1980, c. 595; 1982, c. 406; 1984, c. 430; 1987, c. 571; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-155.
Service retirement allowance.

Retirement allowance. — A member shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable for life, as follows:

Normal retirement. — The allowance shall equal 1.70 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the amount of his creditable service. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for a member who (i) is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or (ii) does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, the allowance shall equal the sum of (a) 1.65 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the amount of his creditable service performed or purchased on or after January 1, 2013, and (b) 1.70 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the amount of all other creditable service.

Early retirement; applicable to teachers, state employees, and certain others. — The allowance shall be determined in the same manner as for normal retirement with creditable service and average final compensation being determined as of the date of actual retirement. If the member has less than 30 years of service at retirement, the amount of the retirement allowance shall be reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis for the period by which the actual retirement date precedes the earlier of (i) his normal retirement date or (ii) the first date on which he would have completed a total of 30 years of creditable service. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to teachers and state employees. These provisions shall also apply to employees of any political subdivision that participates in the retirement system if the political subdivision makes the election provided in subdivision 3.

Early retirement; applicable to employees of certain political subdivisions, any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and any member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013. — The allowance shall be determined in the same manner as for normal retirement with creditable service and average final compensation being determined as of the date of actual retirement. If the creditable service of the member equals 30 or more years but the sum of his age at retirement plus his creditable service at retirement is less than 90, the amount of the retirement allowance shall be reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis for the period by which the actual retirement date precedes the earlier of (i) his normal retirement date or (ii) the first date on which the sum of his then attained age plus his then creditable service would have been equal to 90 or more had he remained in service until such date. If the member has less than 30 years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be reduced for the period by which the actual retirement date precedes the earlier of (i) his normal retirement date or (ii) the first date on which he would have completed a total of at least 30 years of creditable service and his then creditable service plus his then attained age would have been equal to 90 or more.The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to the employees of any political subdivision that participates in the retirement system and any other employees as provided by law. The participating political subdivision may, however, elect to provide its employees with the early retirement allowance set forth in subdivision 2. No such election shall be made for a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013. Any election pursuant to this subdivision shall be set forth in a legally adopted resolution.Notwithstanding the foregoing, a political subdivision by legally adopted resolution may declare to the Board that, for purposes of this subdivision, subdivisions B 1 and B 3 and subsection D of §

51.1-153

, any person who meets the definition of “emergency medical services personnel” in §

32.1-111.1

or is employed as a firefighter or law-enforcement officer as those terms are defined in § 15.2-1512.2 (i) shall not be considered a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) shall be deemed to have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013. Such resolution shall be irrevocable.

Additional allowance. — In addition to the allowance payable under subdivisions 1, 2, and 3, a member shall receive an additional allowance which shall be the actuarial equivalent, for his attained age at the time of retirement, of the excess of his accumulated contributions transferred from the abolished system to the retirement system, including interest credited at the rate of two percent compounded annually since the transfer to the date of retirement, over the annual amounts equal to four percent of his annual creditable compensation at the date of abolishment for a period equal to his period of membership in the abolished system.

50/10 retirement. — The allowance shall be payable in a monthly stream of payments equal to the greater of (i) the actuarial equivalent of the benefit the member would have received had he terminated service and deferred retirement to age 55 or (ii) the actuarially calculated present value of the member’s accumulated contributions, including accrued interest.

Beneficiary serving in position covered by this title.

Except as provided in subdivisions 2, 3, and 4, if a beneficiary of a service retirement allowance under this chapter or the provisions of Chapters 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) is at any time in service as an employee in a position covered for retirement purposes under the provisions of this or any chapter other than Chapter 6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.), 6.1 (§

51.1-607

et seq.), or 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.), his retirement allowance shall cease while so employed. Any member who retires and later returns to covered employment shall not be entitled to select a different retirement option for a subsequent retirement.

Active members of the General Assembly who are eligible to receive a retirement allowance under this title, excluding their service as a member of the General Assembly, shall be eligible to receive a retirement allowance based on their creditable service and average final compensation for service other than as a member of the General Assembly. Such members of the General Assembly shall continue to be reported as any other members of the retirement system. Upon ceasing to serve in the General Assembly, members of the General Assembly receiving a retirement allowance based on their creditable service and average final compensation for service other than as a member of the General Assembly shall have their retirement allowance recomputed prospectively to include their service as a member of the General Assembly. Active members of the General Assembly shall be prohibited from receiving a service retirement allowance under this title based solely on their service as a member of the General Assembly.

(Expires July 1, 2025) Any person receiving a service retirement allowance under this chapter, who is hired by a local school board as an instructional or administrative employee required to be licensed by the Board of Education or as a school bus driver, may elect to continue to receive the retirement allowance during such employment, under the following conditions:

The person has been receiving such retirement allowance for at least 12 calendar months preceding his employment;

The person is not receiving a retirement benefit pursuant to an early retirement incentive program from any local school division within the Commonwealth; and

At the time the person is employed, the position to which he is assigned is among those identified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision 4 of § 22.1-23, by the relevant division superintendent, pursuant to § 22.1-70.3, or by the relevant local school board, pursuant to subdivision 9 of § 22.1-79.If the person elects to continue to receive the retirement allowance during the period of such employment, then his service performed and compensation received during such period of time will not increase, decrease, or affect in any way his retirement benefits before, during, or after such employment.

Any person receiving a service retirement allowance under this title for service as a sworn law-enforcement officer and who is employed in a local school division as a school security officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, may elect to continue to receive the retirement allowance during such employment under the following conditions: (i) the person has a break in service of at least 12 calendar months between retirement for service as a sworn law-enforcement officer and employment as a school security officer; (ii) the person is not receiving a retirement benefit pursuant to an early retirement incentive program from any local school division within the Commonwealth; (iii) the person is not receiving a retirement benefit pursuant to an early retirement incentive program from any employer, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

; and (iv) the person did not participate in any incentive program established under the second or third enactment of Chapters 152 and 811 of the Acts of Assembly of 1995. If the person elects to continue to receive the retirement allowance during the period of such employment, then his service performed and compensation received during such period of time will not increase, decrease, or affect in any way his retirement benefits before, during, or after such employment, nor shall such person be eligible to receive any retirement benefits available to him pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (§

51.1-607

et seq.). In addition, the employer shall include the person’s compensation in membership payroll subject to employer contributions under §

51.1-145

.At least once in each four-year period, in conjunction with the actuarial investigation made under subdivision A 4 of §

51.1-124.22

, there shall be an actuarial investigation made of the experience under subdivisions B 3 and 4 of this section, and the retirement system shall submit a report to the General Assembly advising it of the results of such investigation.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.55; 1956, c. 560; 1960, cc. 138, 604; 1962, c. 417; 1964, c. 223; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1972, cc. 118, 568; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1976, c. 538; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.55:1; 1982, c. 467; 1984, c. 430; 1987, cc. 13, 14; 1988, c. 224; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 719; 1992, c. 826; 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5; 1995, cc. 152, 692, 811; 1998, cc. 407, 674, 746; 1999, c. 111; 2001, cc. 689, 700; 2002, cc. 778, 781; 2003, c. 211; 2004, c. 563; 2005, cc. 605, 606, 793; 2006, c. 513; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2012, cc. 701, 811, 823; 2013, cc. 456, 666; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2020, cc. 379, 437, 968, 969.

Cross references.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 689 and 700, effective March 26, 2001, in cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Retirement System, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall promulgate all reasonable and necessary policies and procedures to carry out the provisions of this act relating to §

51.1-155

.”

Acts 2001, cc. 689 and 700, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2003, c. 211, cl. 2, Acts 2005, c. 609, Acts 2009, c. 590, Acts 2015, c. 326, and Acts 2019, c. 765 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2025.”

Acts 2005, cc. 605 and 606, cl. 2, also amended Acts 2001, cc. 689 and 700, cl. 5, providing for a July 1, 2007, expiration date.

Acts 2002, cc. 778 and 781, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the Virginia Retirement System receives a written ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) that affirmatively states that the provisions of this act, were they to become effective, will not in any way adversely affect the qualified plan status of the Virginia Retirement System under federal law. The Virginia Retirement System shall seek such IRS ruling as soon as practicable in regard to the impact on such qualified plan status from the provisions of this act. Upon receipt of a written response from IRS on such question, the Virginia Retirement System shall communicate the determination made by IRS to the chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Secretary of Education. The Virginia Retirement System shall make the final determination, which shall be consistent with such IRS ruling or determination, of whether the provisions of this act in any way adversely affect the qualified plan status of the Virginia Retirement System under federal law.”

Acts 2004, c. 563, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2005, cc. 607 and 608, Acts 2009, c. 590, Acts 2015, c. 326, and Acts 2019, c. 765, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2025.” Subdivision B 3 has been set out above to expire July 1, 2025, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2005, cc. 605 and 606, cl. 4, provides: “That prior to the 2007 Session of the General Assembly, the Virginia Retirement System shall determine the actuarial cost of this act and report such cost to the chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 1999 amendment

deleted the former undesignated paragraph in subdivision A 1, which read: “For retirements between October 1, 1994, and December 31, 1998, any employee or local officer who is a member or beneficiary of a retirement system administered by the Board
shall receive an additional retirement allowance equal to three percent of the service retirement allowance payable under this section; provided that, for purposes of this additional retirement allowance, the term employee shall include only those employees of political subdivisions that have adopted a resolution providing for such an allowance under subsection B of §

51.1-130

. Average final compensation attributable to service as Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, or member of the General Assembly shall not be included in computing this additional retirement allowance.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by c. 689 and 700, effective March 26, 2001, are identical, and substituted “subdivisions 2 and 3” for “subdivision 2” in subdivision B 1, and added subdivision B 3. For expiration of this amendment, see editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 778 and 781 are identical, and made stylistic changes throughout subdivision B 3; in subdivision B 3 b, substituted “of at least thirty days preceding his employment; and” for “certain period of time preceding his employment as provided by law”; deleted former subdivision B 3 (c), which read: “The person is not receiving a retirement benefit pursuant to an early retirement incentive program from any local school division within the Commonwealth; and,” and redesignated former subdivision B 3 (d) as present subdivision B 3 c; and added subdivisions B 3 d and e. For effective date, see editor’s note.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 211 substituted “30” for “thirty” and “90” for “ninety” throughout the section; substituted “55” for “fifty-five” in subdivision A 5; and in the version of subdivision B 3 effective if the contingency is met and expiring July 1, 2005, deleted former subdivision B 3 e, which read: “The person hired may only be employed for a single year period;” and added the next-to-last paragraph in that subdivision.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 563, effective April 12, 2004, added “by the relevant division superintendent, pursuant to § 22.1-70.3, or by the relevant local school board, pursuant to subdivision 9 of § 22.1-79” to the end of subdivision B 3 (d). For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 605 and 606 are identical, and deleted the first version of subdivision B 3.

The 2005 amendment by c. 793 deleted “of this subsection” in subdivision A 2, the second paragraph of subdivision A 3, and subdivision A 4; in subdivision B 1, inserted “or the provisions of Chapters 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.),” and “6 (§

51.1-600

et seq.), 6.1 (§

51.1-607

et seq.), or,” and deleted “of this title” preceding “his retirement allowance.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 513 deleted former subdivision B 3 (a), which read: “The person’s retirement allowance is based in whole or in part on service as a local school board instructional or administrative employee required to be licensed by the Board of Education,” and redesignated former subdivisions B 3 (b) through B 3 (d) as subdivisions B 3 (a) through B 3 (c).

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and inserted “and any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010” in the first paragraph of subdivision A 3; and in the second paragraph of subdivision A 3, inserted “and any other employees as provided by law” in the first sentence and inserted the next-to-last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and added the second sentence of subdivision A 1; added “or a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013” at the end of the third sentence of the final paragraph of subdivision A 3; and made stylistic changes. Acts 2012, c. 823 added a clause (i) and made related changes in subdivision A 1.

The 2012 amendment by c. 811 added the last paragraph in subdivision A 3.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 456 and 666 are nearly identical, and in the third paragraph of subdivision A 3, substituted “subdivisions B 1 and B 3 and subsection D” for “and subdivisions B 1 and B 3,” inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted clause (ii). Subdivision A 3 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “meets the definition of ‘emergency medical services personnel’ in §

32.1-111.1

or is employed as a firefighter” for “is employed as a firefighter, emergency medical technician” in the third paragraph of subdivision A 3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 379 and 437 are identical, and in subdivision B 3, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “by a local school board as an instructional” for “as a local school board instructional” and inserted “or as a school bus driver.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 968 and 969 are identical, and in subdivision B 1, substituted “subdivisions 2, 3, and 4” for “subdivisions 2 and 3” in the first sentence; in subdivision B 3 (a), substituted “for at least 12 calendar months preceding his employment” for “for a certain period of time preceding his employment as provided by law”; and added subdivision B 4.

§ 51.1-155.1.
Exceptions from general early retirement provisions for certain state employees and constitutional officers.

The provisions of this subsection apply to any member of the retirement system (i) whose position is described by subdivision 1 (except a member of the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.)), 2 (except a member of the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.)), 3, 4 (except an officer elected by popular vote), 7, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, or 20 of §

2.2-2905

; (ii) who is an agency head appointed by a state board, state commission, or state council; or (iii) who is a school division superintendent appointed by a school board pursuant to § 22.1-60, and (a) who is involuntarily separated from state service and (b) who has 20 or more years of creditable service at the date of separation. Such member may retire with the retirement allowance as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 50, provided, however, that if (1) the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, (2) the member does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (3) the member is enrolled in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, then the member may retire with the retirement allowance as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 60.

The provisions of this subsection apply to any member of the retirement system who (i) serves as chief executive officer of an interstate commission pursuant to Virginia’s participation in such commission; (ii) is involuntarily separated from service; and (iii) has 20 or more years of creditable service at the date of separation. Such member may retire without the reduction in retirement allowance required by subdivision A 2 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 50, provided, however, that if (a) the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, (b) the member does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (c) the member is enrolled in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, then the member may retire without the reduction in retirement allowance required by subdivision A 2 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 60.

The provisions of this subsection apply to any member of the retirement system who (i) serves as a constitutional officer, (ii) is involuntarily separated from service because his office is lawfully abolished, and (iii) has 20 or more years of creditable service at the date of separation. Such member may retire with the retirement allowance as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

, upon attaining age 50, provided, however, that if (a) the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, (b) the member does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (c) the member is enrolled in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, then the member may retire with the retirement allowance as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 60.

For the purposes of this section, except for subsection C, “involuntary separation” means any dismissal, requested resignation, or failure to obtain reappointment, except in case of a conviction for a felony or crime involving moral turpitude or dishonesty.

Any state employee who retires under the provisions of this section on or after January 1, 1994, shall be eligible to participate in the state health insurance program as provided in §

2.2-2818

and receive group life insurance benefits as provided in §

51.1-505

.

History.

1994, c. 785; 1995, cc. 152, 692, 721, 811; 1996, cc. 662, 924; 1997, c. 711; 1998, c. 746; 2000, c. 911; 2003, c. 220; 2011, cc. 250, 880; 2014, c. 356.

Cross references.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 220, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to eligible employees who retired or retire on or after July 1, 1999, provided that such employees are alive on or after July 1, 2003.”

The 1998 amendment,

effective April 16, 1998, in subsection A, inserted “(except members of the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.)),” deleted “or” preceding “(ii),” inserted “who are” following “(ii),” inserted “(iii) who are,” inserted “and (a),” and inserted “(b)”; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B through C as present subsections C through D.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911 substituted “fifty” for “fifty-five” at the end of subsections A and B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 220 substituted “20” for “twenty” and “50” for “fifty” in subsections A and B; and deleted “subsection B of” preceding “§

51.1-505

” in subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 250 added subsection C; redesignated former subsection C as subsection D, and therein inserted “except for subsection C”; and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880 substituted “upon attaining age 60 if the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and upon attaining age 50 for any other member” for “upon attaining age 50” at the end of subsections A and B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 rewrote subsections A through C.